New York, session 2025-2026, A7631.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of section 11.00 of the local finance law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 33-a-1 to read as follows: 3 33-a-1. Judgments, compromised claims, or settled claims resulting 4 from section two hundred fourteen-g of the civil practice law and rules. 5 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision thirty-three of this 6 section, the payment of judgments, compromised claims, or settled claims 7 against a school district, board of cooperative educational services, or 8 school district created by special act of the legislature, resulting 9 from court orders on proceedings brought pursuant to section two hundred 10 fourteen-g of the civil practice law and rules, up to thirty years. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10746-01-5